Mississippi statutes. Title 53. Oil, Gas, and Other Minerals
Mississippi Surface Coal Mining and Reclamation Law
§ 53-9-77.
Administrative review; appeal of decisions of the permit board.

Unless otherwise expressly provided in this chapter, any interested party aggrieved by any action of the permit board taken under this chapter may request a formal hearing before the permit board as provided in Section 49-17-29(4). Any interested party aggrieved by any action of the commission, executive director or the executive director’s authorized representative taken under this chapter may request a formal hearing before the commission as provided in Section 49-17-41. Any person who participated as a party in a formal hearing before the permit board may appeal from a final decision of the permit board made under this chapter as provided in Section 49-17-29(5). Any person who participated as a party in a formal hearing before the commission may appeal from a final decision of the commission made under this chapter as provided in Section 49-17-41.

Any public hearing of the permit board provided for under this chapter shall be deemed to be the same hearing as otherwise afforded to any interested party by the permit board under Section 49-17-29(4)(a). Any formal hearing of the permit board provided for under this chapter shall be deemed to be the same hearing as otherwise afforded to any interested party by the permit board under Section 49-17-29(4)(b).

Any public hearing of the commission provided for under this chapter shall be deemed to be the same hearing as afforded under Section 49-17-35. Any formal hearing of the commission provided for under this chapter shall be deemed to be the same hearing as afforded under Section 49-17-41.

In conducting any formal hearing under this chapter the permit board shall have the same authority to subpoena witnesses, administer oaths, examine witnesses under oath and conduct the hearing as provided in Section 49-17-29.

In conducting any formal hearing under this chapter the commission shall have the same authority to subpoena witnesses, administer oaths, examine witnesses under oath and conduct the hearing as provided in Section 49-17-41.

The commission may appoint a hearing officer to conduct any formal hearing under this chapter. The hearing officer shall have the same authority to conduct the hearing as provided the commission under Section 49-17-41.

Upon written request by an alleged violator under Section 53-9-69, the commission or the hearing officer shall conduct a formal hearing and may, upon the basis of evidence presented at the hearing, stay any action taken by the executive director or the executive director’s authorized representative under Section 53-9-69. The hearing officer may require a bond, if the hearing officer stays the action.

Except as provided in Section 53-9-67, the availability of judicial review under this section shall not limit any rights established under Section 53-9-67.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 33; Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 37; Laws, 1998, ch. 373, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved March 16, 1998).

§ 53-9-79.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 47, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1997).

[Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 34.].

§ 53-9-81.
Inapplicability of chapter.

This chapter shall not apply to any of the following activities:

The extraction of coal by a landowner for that landowner’s own noncommercial use from land owned or leased by the landowner; and

The extraction of coal as an incidental part of federal, state or local financed highways or other construction under regulations promulgated by the commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 35; Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 38, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1997).

§ 53-9-83.
Lease of state coal deposits.

This section applies where coal owned by the state under land, the surface rights to which are owned by a surface owner as defined in this section, is to be mined by methods other than underground mining techniques.

The state shall not enter into any lease of state coal deposits until the surface owner has given written consent to enter and commence surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the commission has obtained evidence of that consent. Written consent given by any surface owner before July 1, 1979, shall be deemed sufficient for the purposes of complying with this section.

In order to minimize disturbance to surface owners from surface coal mining of state coal deposits and to assist in the preparation of comprehensive land-use plans, the state geologist shall consult with any surface owner whose land is proposed to be included in a leasing tract and shall ask the surface owner to declare a preference for or against the offering of the deposit under this land for lease. The state shall, in its discretion but to the maximum extent practicable, refrain from leasing coal deposits for development by methods other than underground mining techniques in those areas where a significant number of surface owners have declared a preference against the offering of the deposits for lease.

For the purpose of this section, “surface owner” means the natural person or persons, or corporation, the majority stock of which is held by a person or persons who meet the other requirements of this section, who:

Hold legal or equitable title to the land surface;

Have their principal place of residence on the land or are personally conducting farming or ranching operations upon a farm or ranch unit which is to be affected by surface coal mining and reclamation operations, or receive directly a significant portion of their income, if any, from those farming or ranching operations; and

Have met the conditions of paragraphs (a) and (b) for at least three (3) years before granting consent.

In computing the three-year period, the commission may include periods during which title was owned by a relative of that person by blood or marriage during which period the relative would have met the requirements of this subsection.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as increasing or diminishing any property rights held by the state or by any other landowner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 38; Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 39, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1997).

§ 53-9-85.
Enforcement and protection of water rights.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as affecting in any way the right of any person to enforce or protect, under applicable law, that person’s interest in water resources affected by a surface coal mining operation.

The operator of a surface coal mine shall replace the water supply of an owner of interest in real property who obtains all or part of that person’s supply of water for domestic, agricultural, industrial or other legitimate use from an underground or surface source where the supply has been affected by contamination, diminution or interruption proximately resulting from the surface coal mining or reclamation operation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 39; Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 40, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1997).

§ 53-9-87.
Training, examination, and certification of persons responsible for blasting.

The commission shall promulgate regulations requiring the training, examination and certification of persons engaging in or directly responsible for blasting or use of explosives in surface coal mining operations.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 40; Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 41, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1997).

§ 53-9-89.
Surface Coal Mining and Reclamation fund; deposit of funds.

There is created in the State Treasury a fund to be designated as the “Surface Coal Mining and Reclamation Fund.” The fund shall contain three (3) accounts, designated as the “Surface Coal Mining Program Operations Account,” the “Surface Coal Mining Reclamation Account,” and the “Abandoned Mine Lands Reclamation Account.”

Monies in the Surface Coal Mining Program Operations Account shall be used to pay the reasonable direct and indirect costs of administering and enforcing this chapter. Monies in the Surface Coal Mining Reclamation Account shall be used to pay for the reclamation of lands for which bonds or other collateral were forfeited.

The Abandoned Mine Lands Reclamation Account shall receive all state and federal appropriations, grants and donations for the purposes of the reclamation of abandoned mine lands under this chapter, and such funds shall be made available to the commission to be used as provided in this section for the purposes of abandoned mine reclamation under this chapter and the regulations of the commission. Funds in the Abandoned Mine Land Account may be used for the following purposes:

Reclamation and restoration of land and water resources adversely affected by past coal mining, or by past noncoal mining if approved by the secretary, including, but not limited to, reclamation and restoration of abandoned surface mine areas, abandoned mine processing areas, and abandoned mine refuse disposal areas; sealing and filling abandoned deep mine entries and voids; planting of land adversely affected by past mining to prevent erosion and sedimentation; prevention, abatement, treatment, and control of water pollution created by mine drainage including restoration of stream beds, and construction and operation of water treatment plants; prevention, abatement, and control of burning coal in situs; prevention, abatement and control of mine subsidence; prevention, abatement and control of storm water runoff from and erosion at mine sites; and the sloping and revegetation of mine pits and highwalls.

Acquisition of land as provided for in this chapter.

Grants to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

Administrative expenses of the department to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

All other necessary expenses to accomplish the purpose of reclaiming abandoned mine lands or of protecting public health, safety and general welfare from adverse effects of mining practices at abandoned mine lands.

Expenditures may be made from the fund upon requisition by the executive director.

The fund shall be treated as a special trust fund. Interest earned on the principal shall be credited by the Treasurer to the appropriate account in the fund.

The Surface Coal Mining Program Operations Account may receive monies from any available public or private source, including, but not limited to, fees, interest, grants, taxes, public and private donations, petroleum violation escrow funds or refunds, and appropriated funds, but excluding fines, penalties and the proceeds from the forfeiture of bonds or other collateral. The Surface Coal Mining Reclamation Account may receive monies from fines, penalties, the proceeds from the forfeiture of bonds or other collateral and interest.

All funds received through the payment of fees, loans, grants, penalties, bond forfeitures and forfeitures of other collateral, less attorneys’ fees, shall be deposited in the appropriate account in the Surface Coal Mining and Reclamation Fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 41; Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 42; Laws, 2001, ch. 426, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 53-9-91.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 48, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1997).

[Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 42]